New Jersey, session 221, S308.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.40A:9-133 is amended to read as follows: 40A:9-133.  a. In every municipality there shall be a municipal clerk appointed for a three-year term by the governing body of the municipality.  The requirement that every municipality shall have a municipal clerk may be fulfilled by the sharing of a municipal clerk with another municipality or municipalities under a shared service agreement entered into pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2007, c.63 (C.40A:65-1 et seq.), and such shared service agreement shall be subject to the provisions of section 4 of P.L.2007, c.63(C.40A:65-4) and, in the case of a shared service agreement between pilot municipalities, section 3 of P.L.2013, c.166 (C.40A:65-4.2).  Commencing January 1 following the third anniversary of the effective date of P.L.1997, c.279 (C.40A:9-133.9 et al.), no person shall be appointed or reappointed as a municipal clerk unless that person holds a registered municipal clerk certificate issued pursuant to section 3 or section 4 of P.L.1985, c.174 (C.40A:9-133.3 or C.40A:9-133.4). b.    For the purposes of tenure, the term of a municipal clerk shall be deemed to have begun as of the actual date upon which a person serving as municipal clerk is appointed.  In the event of a vacancy in the office of municipal clerk, an appointment shall be made for a new term and not for the unexpired term.  A reappointment of an incumbent municipal clerk made within 60 days following the expiration of the prior term shall not be considered to be a new appointment and the effective date of the reappointment shall date back to the date of expiration of the initial term of appointment. c.     Within 90 days of the occurrence of a vacancy in the office of municipal clerk by reason of the departure of a registered municipal clerk, the governing body may appoint a person who does not hold a registered municipal clerk certificate to serve as acting municipal clerk for a period not to exceed one year and commencing on the date of the vacancy.  Any person so appointed may, with the approval of the Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs, be reappointed as acting municipal clerk for a maximum of two subsequent one-year terms following the termination of the temporary appointment.  No local unit shall fill the position of acting municipal clerk for more than three consecutive years.  Time served as acting municipal clerk may be credited toward the experience authorized as a substitute for the college education requirement pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1985, c.174 (C.40A:9-133.2).  Time served as acting municipal clerk may not be credited as time served as municipal clerk for the purpose of acquiring tenure pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1985, c.174 (C.40A:9-133.7). d.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1997, c.279). e.     The municipal clerk shall: (1)   act as secretary of the municipal corporation and custodian of the municipal seal and of all minutes, books, deeds, bonds, contracts, and archival records of the municipal corporation.  The governing body may, however, provide by ordinance that any other specific officer shall have custody of any specific other class of record; (2)   act as secretary to the governing body, prepare meeting agendas at the discretion of the governing body, be present at all meetings of the governing body, keep a journal of the proceedings of every meeting, retain the original copies of all ordinances and resolutions, and record the minutes of every meeting; (3)   serve as the chief administrative officer in all elections held in the municipality, subject to the requirements of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes; (4)   serve as chief registrar of voters in the municipality, subject to the requirements of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes; (5)   serve as the administrative officer responsible for the acceptance of applications for licenses and permits and the issuance of licenses and permits, except where statute or municipal ordinance has delegated that responsibility to some other municipal officer; (6)   serve as coordinator and records manager responsible for implementing local archives and records retention programs as mandated pursuant to Title 47 of the Revised Statutes; (7)   perform such other duties as are now or hereafter imposed by statute, regulation or by municipal ordinance or regulation. f.     If a governing body fails or refuses to comply with subsection a., b. or c. of this section, the director may order the governing body to comply by a date certain which shall afford the governing body a reasonable time within which to comply. g.    Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or State law, rule, or regulation, the municipal clerk shall post or make available on the municipalitys Internet website all municipal documents, forms, renewal documents, license applications, and license certificates.  A municipality that incurs costs in implementing the requirements of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) may annually certify those costs and apply to the Department of the Treasury for reimbursement of those costs.  The Department of the Treasury shall disburse annually to each municipality that submits an application pursuant to this subsection the amount necessary to reimburse the municipality for the costs incurred by the municipality to implement the requirements of P.L.    ,c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The department, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations establishing procedures for the submission of applications and the disbursement of funds as necessary to implement this subsection. (cf: P.L.2013, c.166, s.7) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.